Nebraska, session 109, LB85.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
Section 1. Section 30-24,125, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
30-24,125 (a) Thirty days after the death of a decedent, any person
indebted to the decedent or having possession of tangible personal property or
an instrument evidencing a debt, obligation, stock, or chose in action
belonging to the decedent shall make payment of the indebtedness or deliver the
tangible personal property or an instrument evidencing a debt, obligation,
stock, or chose in action to a person claiming to be the successor of the
decedent upon being presented an affidavit made by or on behalf of the
successor stating:
(1) the value of all of the personal property in the decedent's estate,
wherever located, less liens and encumbrances, does not exceed one hundred
thousand dollars;
(2) thirty days have elapsed since the death of the decedent as shown in a
certified or authenticated copy of the decedent's death certificate, or in the
event of a delay in the production of a certified death certificate, an
abstract of death as defined in section 71-601.01, attached to the affidavit;
(3) the claiming successor's relationship to the decedent or, if there is
no relationship, the basis of the successor's claim to the personal property;
(4) the person or persons claiming as successors under the affidavit swear
or affirm that all statements in the affidavit are true and material and
further acknowledge that any false statement may subject the person or persons
to penalties relating to perjury under section 28-915;
(5) no application or petition for the appointment of a personal
representative is pending or has been granted in any jurisdiction; and
(6) the claiming successor is entitled to payment or delivery of the
property.
(b) A transfer agent of any security shall change the registered ownership
on the books of a corporation from the decedent to the successor or successors
upon the presentation of an affidavit as provided in subsection (a).
(c) Upon the presentation of an affidavit as provided in subsection (a),
the claiming successor may endorse or negotiate any instrument evidencing a
debt belonging to the decedent that is a check, draft, or other negotiable
instrument that is payable to the decedent or the decedent's estate.
Notwithstanding the provisions of section 3-403, 3-417, or 3-420, Uniform
Commercial Code, a financial institution accepting such a check, draft, or
other negotiable instrument presented for deposit in such manner is discharged
from all claims for the amount accepted.
(d)(1) Except as provided in subdivision (d)(2), in addition to compliance
with the requirements of subsection (a), a person seeking a transfer of a
certificate of title to a motor vehicle, motorboat, all-terrain vehicle,
utility-type vehicle, or minibike shall be required to furnish to the
Department of Motor Vehicles an affidavit showing applicability of this section
and compliance with the requirements of this section to authorize the
department to issue a new certificate of title.
(2) After ten years have elapsed since the estate has closed, the
Department of Motor Vehicles shall waive the requirements of subdivision (a)(5)
if the person seeking a transfer of a certificate of title provides evidence
that the estate has closed and a certified authenticated copy of the decedent's
death certificate.
Sec. 2. Original section 30-24,125, Revised Statutes Cumulative
Supplement, 2024, is repealed.
-1-